Florida, session 2026, SB330.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âSection 112.18, Florida Statutes, is amended to 21 read: 22 112.18âFirefighters and law enforcement or correctional 23 officers; special provisions relative to disability.â 24 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 25 (a)ââCorrectional officerâ has the same meaning as in s. 26 943.10(2). 27 (b)ââCorrectional probation officerâ has the same meaning 28 as in s. 943.10(3). 29 (c)ââEmploying agencyâ has the same meaning as in s. 30 943.10(4). 31 (d)ââFire service providerâ has the same meaning as in s. 32 633.102(13). 33 (e)ââHeart diseaseâ means any organic, mechanical, or 34 functional abnormality of the heart or its structures or of the 35 coronary arteries. 36 (f)ââLaw enforcement officerâ has the same meaning as in s. 37 943.10(1). 38 (g)ââMedical specialistâ means a physician licensed under 39 chapter 458 or chapter 459 who has a board certification in a 40 medical specialty inclusive of care and treatment of 41 tuberculosis, heart disease, or hypertension. 42 (h)ââPrescribed course of treatmentâ means prescribed 43 medical courses of action and prescribed medicines for the 44 specific disease or diseases claimed, as documented by the 45 prescribing physician in the patientâs medical records. 46 (2)(a)(1)(a)âAny condition or impairment of health of any 47 Florida state, municipal, county, port authority, special tax 48 district, or fire control district firefighter or any law 49 enforcement officer, correctional officer, or correctional 50 probation officer as defined in s. 943.10(1), (2), or (3) caused 51 by tuberculosis, heart disease, or hypertension resulting in 52 total or partial disability or death shall be presumed to have 53 been accidental and to have been suffered in the line of duty 54 unless the contrary be shown by competent evidence. However, any 55 such firefighter, law enforcement officer, correctional officer, 56 or correctional probation officer must have successfully passed 57 a physical examination upon entering into any such service as a 58 firefighter, law enforcement officer, correctional officer, or 59 correctional probation officer, which examination failed to 60 reveal any evidence of any such condition. Such presumption does 61 not apply to benefits payable under or granted in a policy of 62 life insurance or disability insurance, unless the insurer and 63 insured have negotiated for such additional benefits to be 64 included in the policy contract. 65 (b)1.âIf a firefighter did not undergo a preemployment 66 physical examination, the medical examination required by s. 67 633.412(5) is shall be deemed to satisfy the physical 68 examination requirement under paragraph (a), if the medical 69 examination completed pursuant to s. 633.412(5) failed to reveal 70 any evidence of tuberculosis, heart disease, or hypertension. 71 2.âIf a firefighter underwent a preemployment physical 72 examination, the employing fire service provider, as defined in 73 s. 633.102, must maintain records of the physical examination 74 for at least 5 years after the employeeâs separation from the 75 employing fire service provider. If the employing fire service 76 provider fails to maintain the records of the physical 77 examination for the 5-year period after the employeeâs 78 separation, it is presumed that the employee has met the 79 requirements of paragraph (a). 80 (c)âIf a current law enforcement officer, correctional 81 officer, or correctional probation officer was not required to 82 undergo a preemployment physical examination upon entering 83 service with his or her current employing agency, but such 84 officer underwent a medical examination as required by s. 85 943.13(6) upon entering service with his or her former employing 86 agency, the previously conducted medical examination conducted 87 pursuant to s. 943.13(6) is deemed to satisfy the physical 88 examination requirement under paragraph (a), if such examination 89 was completed and failed to reveal any evidence of tuberculosis, 90 heart disease, or hypertension. 91 (d)1.âFor any workersâ compensation claim filed under this 92 section and chapter 440 occurring on or after July 1, 2010, a 93 law enforcement officer, correctional officer, or correctional 94 probation officer as defined in s. 943.10(1), (2), or (3) 95 suffering from tuberculosis, heart disease, or hypertension is 96 presumed not to have incurred such disease in the line of duty 97 as provided in this section if the law enforcement officer, 98 correctional officer, or correctional probation officer: 99 a.âDeparted in a material fashion from the prescribed 100 course of treatment of his or her personal physician and the 101 departure is demonstrated to have resulted in a significant 102 aggravation of the tuberculosis, heart disease, or hypertension 103 resulting in disability or increasing the disability or need for 104 medical treatment; or 105 b.âWas previously compensated pursuant to this section and 106 chapter 440 for tuberculosis, heart disease, or hypertension and 107 thereafter sustains and reports a new compensable workersâ 108 compensation claim under this section and chapter 440, and the 109 law enforcement officer, correctional officer, or correctional 110 probation officer has departed in a material fashion from the 111 prescribed course of treatment of an authorized physician for 112 the preexisting workersâ compensation claim and the departure is 113 demonstrated to have resulted in a significant aggravation of 114 the tuberculosis, heart disease, or hypertension resulting in 115 disability or increasing the disability or need for medical 116 treatment. 117 2.âAs used in this paragraph, âprescribed course of 118 treatmentâ means prescribed medical courses of action and 119 prescribed medicines for the specific disease or diseases 120 claimed and as documented in the prescribing physicianâs medical 121 records. 122 2.3.âIf there is a dispute as to the appropriateness of the 123 course of treatment prescribed by a physician under sub 124 subparagraph 1.a. or sub-subparagraph 1.b. or whether a 125 departure in a material fashion from the prescribed course of 126 treatment is demonstrated to have resulted in a significant 127 aggravation of the tuberculosis, heart disease, or hypertension 128 resulting in disability or increasing the disability or need for 129 medical treatment, the law enforcement officer, correctional 130 officer, or correctional probation officer is entitled to seek 131 an independent medical examination pursuant to s. 440.13(5). 132 3.4.âA law enforcement officer, correctional officer, or 133 correctional probation officer is not entitled to the 134 presumption provided in this section unless a claim for benefits 135 is made prior to or within 180 days after leaving the employment 136 of the employing agency. 137 (3)(2)âThis section authorizes each governmental entity 138 specified in subsection (2) (1) to negotiate policy contracts 139 for life and disability insurance to include accidental death 140 benefits or double indemnity coverage which includes shall 141 include the presumption that any condition or impairment of 142 health of any firefighter, law enforcement officer, or 143 correctional officer caused by tuberculosis, heart disease, or 144 hypertension resulting in total or partial disability or death 145 was accidental and suffered in the line of duty, unless the 146 contrary be shown by competent evidence. 147 (4)(3)(a)âNotwithstanding s. 440.13(2)(c), a firefighter, 148 law enforcement officer, correctional officer, or correctional 149 probation officer requiring medical treatment for a compensable 150 presumptive condition listed in subsection (2) (1) may be 151 treated by a medical specialist. Except in emergency situations, 152 a firefighter, law enforcement officer, correctional officer, or 153 correctional probation officer entitled to access a medical 154 specialist under this subsection must provide written notice of 155 his or her selection of a medical specialist to the 156 firefighterâs or officerâs workersâ compensation carrier, self 157 insured employer, or third-party administrator, and the carrier, 158 self-insured employer, or third-party administrator must 159 authorize the selected medical specialist or authorize an 160 alternative medical specialist with the same or greater 161 qualifications. Within 5 business days after receipt of the 162 written notice, the workersâ compensation carrier, self-insured 163 employer, or third-party administrator must authorize treatment 164 and schedule an appointment, which must be held within 30 days 165 after receipt of the written notice, with the selected medical 166 specialist or the alternative medical specialist. If the 167 workersâ compensation carrier, self-insured employer, or third 168 party administrator fails to authorize an alternative medical 169 specialist within 5 business days after receipt of the written 170 notice, the medical specialist selected by the firefighter or 171 officer is authorized. The continuing care and treatment by a 172 medical specialist must be reasonable, necessary, and related to 173 tuberculosis, heart disease, or hypertension; be reimbursed at 174 no more than 200 percent of the Medicare rate for a selected 175 medical specialist; and be authorized by the firefighterâs or 176 officerâs workersâ compensation carrier, self-insured employer, 177 or third-party administrator. 178 (b)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term âmedical 179 specialistâ means a physician licensed under chapter 458 or 180 chapter 459 who has board certification in a medical specialty 181 inclusive of care and treatment of tuberculosis, heart disease, 182 or hypertension. 183 Section 2.âSubsection (6) of section 943.13, Florida 184 Statutes, is amended to read: 185 943.13âOfficersâ minimum qualifications for employment or 186 appointment.âOn or after October 1, 1984, any person employed or 187 appointed as a full-time, part-time, or auxiliary law 188 enforcement officer or correctional officer; on or after October 189 1, 1986, any person employed as a full-time, part-time, or 190 auxiliary correctional probation officer; and on or after 191 October 1, 1986, any person employed as a full-time, part-time, 192 or auxiliary correctional officer by a private entity under 193 contract to the Department of Corrections or to a county 194 commission shall: 195 (6)âHave passed a physical examination by a licensed 196 physician, physician assistant, or licensed advanced practice 197 registered nurse, based on specifications established by the 198 commission. In order to be eligible for the presumption set 199 forth in s. 112.18 while employed with an employing agency, a 200 law enforcement officer, correctional officer, or correctional 201 probation officer must have successfully passed the physical 202 examination required by this subsection upon entering into 203 service as a law enforcement officer, correctional officer, or 204 correctional probation officer with the employing agency, which 205 examination must have failed to reveal any evidence of 206 tuberculosis, heart disease, or hypertension. A law enforcement 207 officer, correctional officer, or correctional probation officer 208 may not use a physical examination from a former employing 209 agency for purposes of claiming the presumption set forth in s. 210 112.18 against the current employing agency only if the current 211 employing agency did not require the law enforcement officer, 212 correctional officer, or correctional probation officer to 213 undergo a physical examination as required by this subsection. 214 The employing agency must maintain records of the physical 215 examination for at least 5 years after the employeeâs separation 216 from the employing agency. If the employing agency fails to 217 maintain the records of the physical examination for the 5-year 218 period after the employeeâs separation, it is presumed that the 219 employee has met the requirements of this subsection. 220 Section 3.âThe Legislature finds and declares that this act 221 fulfills an important state interest. 222 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.